Hawaii statutes.
§38-7 Responsibility of director. The
director shall not be responsible for any moneys deposited in a depository
under this chapter, but the State through its director shall be chargeable with
the safekeeping of the bonds deposited with the director as security for
deposits of state money, and of the proceeds of any sale of the bonds made
under this chapter. [L 1970, c 51, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next